Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4314
Sexual assault forensic evidence; uses prohibited.

Sexual assault forensic evidence from a victim shall not be used:

(1) To prosecute such victim for any misdemeanor crime or any crime under the Uniform Controlled Substances Act; or

(2) As a basis to search for further evidence of any misdemeanor crime or any crime under the Uniform Controlled Substances Act that may have been committed by the victim.

Laws 2020, LB43, § 7.

Uniform Controlled Substances Act, see section 28-401.01.